Wisconsin, session 2025, SB623.
do enact as follows:SB623,13Section 1. 293.49 (1) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB623,2,24293.49 (1) (a) (intro.) Except as provided in sub. (2) and s. 293.50 and except 5with respect to property specified in s. 41.41 (11), within 90 days of the completion 1of the public hearing record, the department shall issue the mining permit if it 2finds:SB623,23Section 2. 293.50 of the statutes is created to read:SB623,2,64293.50 Moratorium on issuance of permits for mining of sulfide ore 5bodies. (1) In this section, “sulfide ore body” means a mineral deposit in which 6metals are mixed with sulfide minerals.SB623,2,97(2) Beginning on the effective date of this subsection .... [LRB inserts date], 8the department may not issue a permit under s. 293.49 for the mining of a sulfide 9ore body until all of the following conditions are satisfied:SB623,2,1410(a) The department determines, based on information provided by an 11applicant for a permit under s. 293.49, that a mining operation has operated in a 12sulfide ore body of similar geological characteristics in the United States or Canada 13for at least 10 years without the pollution of groundwater or surface water from acid 14drainage at the tailings site or at the mine site or from the release of heavy metals.SB623,2,2015(b) The department determines, based on information provided by an 16applicant for a permit under s. 293.49, that a mining operation that operated in a 17sulfide ore body of similar geological characteristics in the United States or Canada 18has been closed for at least 10 years without the pollution of groundwater or surface 19water from acid drainage at the tailings site or at the mine site or from the release 20of heavy metals.SB623,2,2221(3) This section applies without regard to the date of submission of the permit 22application.SB623,2,2323